Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Article 5. Enforcement of Support Order Without Registration.

§ 93-25-501.
Employer’s receipt of income-withholding order of another state.

An income-withholding order issued in another state may be sent by or on behalf of the obligee, or by the support enforcement agency to the person defined as the obligor’s employer under Sections 93-11-101 through 93-11-119 without first filing a complaint or comparable pleading or registering the order with a tribunal of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 93-25-502.
Employer’s compliance with income-withholding order of another state.

Upon receipt of an income-withholding order, the obligor’s employer shall immediately provide a copy of the order to the obligor.

The employer shall treat an income-withholding order issued in another state which appears regular on its face as if it had been issued by a tribunal of this state.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) and Section 93-25-503, the employer shall withhold and distribute the funds as directed in the withholding order by complying with the terms of the order which specify:

The duration and amount of periodic payments of current child support, stated as a sum certain;

The person designated to receive payments and the address to which the payments are to be forwarded;

Medical support, whether in the form of periodic cash payment, stated as a sum certain, or ordering the obligor to provide health insurance coverage for the child under a policy available through the obligor’s employment;

The amount of periodic payments of fees and costs for a support enforcement agency, the issuing tribunal, and the obligee’s attorney, stated as sums certain; and

The amount of periodic payments of arrearages and interest on arrearages, stated as sums certain.

An employer shall comply with the law of the state of the obligor’s principal place of employment for withholding from income with respect to:

The employer’s fees for processing an income-withholding order;

The maximum amount permitted to be withheld from the obligor’s income; and

The times within which the employer must implement the withholding order and forward the child-support payment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 93-25-503.
Employer’s compliance with two or more income-withholding orders of another state.

If an obligor’s employer receives two (2) or more income-withholding orders with respect to the earnings of the same obligor, the employer satisfies the terms of the orders if the employer complies with the law of the state of the obligor’s principal place of employment to establish the priorities for withholding and allocating income withheld for two (2) or more child-support obligees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 93-25-504.
Immunity from civil liability.

An employer that complies with an income-withholding order issued in another state in accordance with this article is not subject to civil liability to an individual or agency with regard to the employer’s withholding of child support from the obligor’s income.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 93-25-505.
Penalties for noncompliance.

An employer that willfully fails to comply with an income-withholding order issued in another state and received for enforcement is subject to the same penalties that may be imposed for noncompliance with an order issued by a tribunal of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 93-25-506.
Contest by obligor.

An obligor may contest the validity or enforcement of an income-withholding order issued in another state and received directly by an employer in this state by registering the order in a tribunal of this state and filing a contest to that order as provided in Article 6, or otherwise contesting the order in the same manner as if the order had been issued by a tribunal of this state.

The obligor shall give notice of the contest to:

A support enforcement agency providing services to the obligee;

Each employer that has directly received an income-withholding order relating to the obligor; and

The person designated to receive payments in the income-withholding order, or if no person is designated, to the obligee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 93-25-507.
Administrative enforcement of orders.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to enforce a support order or an income-withholding order, or both, issued in another state or a foreign support order may send the documents required for registering the order to a support enforcement agency of this state.

Upon receipt of the documents, the support enforcement agency, without initially seeking to register the order, shall consider and, if appropriate, use any administrative procedure authorized by the law of this state to enforce a support order or an income-withholding order, or both. If the obligor does not contest administrative enforcement, the order need not be registered. If the obligor contests the validity or administrative enforcement of the order, the support enforcement agency shall register the order pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.